Massachusetts, session 194th, S2074.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 44 of chapter 85 of the acts of 1994 is hereby amended by inserting at the end
thereof the following sentence:-
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, any historic property
designated as such by this section shall not be subject to the provisions of chapter 59 of the
General Laws.
of 1